Hawaii statutes.
§373C-23 Responsibilities. The
department of labor and industrial relations shall be responsible for the
preparation of occupational employment demand information concerning projected
needs for occupational skills in Hawaii's labor market. The department of
education and University of Hawaii systems shall be responsible for the
production of uniform educational supply data concerning students in courses
related to each occupational category.

The workforce development council shall be
responsible for coordinating the production of federally funded training supply
data concerning trainees enrolled and completing training programs in each
occupational category. The department of human services shall be responsible
for preparing information concerning welfare and vocational trainees enrolled
and completing training by occupational category.

All of the identified entities in this section
shall jointly develop and produce, to the extent feasible, other data required
of the occupational information system. [L 1983, c 193, pt of §1; am L 1987, c
339, §4; am L 2001, c 171, §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next